Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6317
Asbestos Control Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-6301 to 71-6317 shall be known and may be cited as the Asbestos Control Act.

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 80;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1259.

Asbestos removal, credentialing provisions, see sections 38-1,119 to 38-1,123.